trunk/incubator/comb.da.dix
    <pardef n="ko/p__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
          <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ppen</l>
          <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pper</l>
          <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pperne</l>
          <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ps</l>
          <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ppens</l>
          <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ppers</l>
          <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ppernes</l>
          <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oen</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øer</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øerne</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oens</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øers</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øernes</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mode/m__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>m<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mmet</l>
          <r>m<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mmer</l>
          <r>m<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mmerne</l>
          <r>m<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ms</l>
          <r>m<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mmets</l>
          <r>m<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mmers</l>
          <r>m<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mmernes</l>
          <r>m<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dims__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ers</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ernes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Verbs -->

    <pardef n="/være__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vær</l>
          <r>være<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>være</l>
          <r>være<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>være<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>var</l>
          <r>være<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>været</l>
          <r>være<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ha/ve__vbhaver">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>v</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vde</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ft</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tal/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mal/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ede</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="være"><i></i><par n="/være__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="have"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="afhøre"><i>afhør</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afrunde"><i>afrund</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aftale"><i>aftal</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="anerkende"><i>anerkend</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="animere"><i>animer</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="anråbe"><i>anråb</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="anvende"><i>anvend</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="barbere"><i>barber</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="begynde"><i>begynd</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="belemre"><i>belemr</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="belære"><i>belær</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beskylde"><i>beskyld</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="besvare"><i>besvar</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bilde"><i>bild</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bortføre"><i>bortfør</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="boykotte"><i>boykott</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="brænde"><i>brænd</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="danse"><i>dans</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="diktere"><i>dikter</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="døbe"><i>døb</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="effektuere"><i>effektuer</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="eftersøge"><i>eftersøg</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="etablere"><i>etabler</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fastholde"><i>fasthold</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="foragte"><i>foragt</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forbrænde"><i>forbrænd</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forgrene"><i>forgren</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forklæde"><i>forklæd</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forpeste"><i>forpest</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forundre"><i>forundr</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forvise"><i>forvis</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="frustrere"><i>frustrer</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="føde"><i>fød</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gennemtrumfe"><i>gennemtrumf</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gennemtænke"><i>gennemtænk</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="henrette"><i>henrett</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="henvende"><i>henvend</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hæve"><i>hæv</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="indbetale"><i>indbetal</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="indkredse"><i>indkreds</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="insistere"><i>insister</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kapre"><i>kapr</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kende"><i>kend</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="komplettere"><i>kompletter</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kritisere"><i>kritiser</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ligestille"><i>ligestill</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="læse"><i>læs</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="medvirke"><i>medvirk</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mide"><i>mid</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="narre"><i>narr</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="næse"><i>næs</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="omgærde"><i>omgærd</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="omtale"><i>omtal</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="opløfte"><i>opløft</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="opretholde"><i>oprethold</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="overhale"><i>overhal</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="overlade"><i>overlad</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="plyndre"><i>plyndr</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pudse"><i>puds</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="påtale"><i>påtal</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="registrere"><i>registrer</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rumme"><i>rumm</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sagsøge"><i>sagsøg</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="selvstyre"><i>selvstyr</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skælde"><i>skæld</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spire"><i>spir</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spøge"><i>spøg</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sænke"><i>sænk</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tilbageføre"><i>tilbagefør</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tilkalde"><i>tilkald</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="trænge"><i>træng</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="udbytte"><i>udbytt</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="udelade"><i>udelad</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="udråbe"><i>udråb</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="udvise"><i>udvis</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="undertegne"><i>undertegn</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vende"><i>vend</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
